Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
POWERS AND DUTIES OF COMMISSIONER

Note

Annual study and report to 2017-2021 legislature by insurance
commissioner on impact of L 2016, c 236 (regarding transportation network
companies) on personal motor vehicle insurance policy rates in the State
(repealed September 1, 2021). L 2016, c 236, §§3, 6.

State innovation waiver task force; health care reform plan;
reports to 2015-2017 legislature (dissolved June 30, 2017). L 2014, c 158; L
2015, c 184.

§431:2-201 General powers and duties. (a)
The commissioner shall have the authority expressly conferred upon the
commissioner by or reasonably implied from the provisions of this code.

(b) The commissioner shall execute the
commissioner's duties and shall enforce this code.

(c) The commissioner may:

(1) Make reasonable rules for effectuating any
provision of this code, except those relating to the commissioner's
appointment, qualifications, or compensation. The commissioner shall adopt
rules to effectuate article 10C of chapter 431, subject to the approval of the
governor's office and the requirements of chapter 91;

(2) Conduct examinations and investigations to
determine whether any person has violated any provision of this code or to
secure information useful in the lawful administration of any provision;

(3) Require applicants to provide fingerprints and
pay a fee to allow the commissioner to make a determination of license
eligibility after obtaining state and national criminal history record checks
from the Hawaii criminal justice data center and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation; and

(4) Require, upon reasonable notice, that insurers
report any claims information the commissioner may deem necessary to protect
the public interest. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 275, §12; am L
2003, c 212, §15; am L 2009, c 77, §13]

Attorney General Opinions

The division will be responsible for enforcement of health
insurance provisions of the reciprocal beneficiaries act [L 1997, c 383],
because those provisions are placed within the insurance code and, therefore,
are within the commissioner's enforcement responsibility under subsection (b);
those provisions can only be enforced against insurers, not employers. Att.
Gen. Op. 97-10.

Case Notes

Commissioner's rulemaking authority enabled commissioner to
adopt procedural mechanism, i.e., peer review process, through which guidelines
for service provider fees and frequency of treatment may be exceeded. 927 F.
Supp. 1330.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next